Arkansas, session 2025, SB416.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-10-101 is repealed.
15-10-101. Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Grant Program.
(a) There is created within the Department of Energy and Environment
the Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Grant Program to be administered by the
Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment.
(b) The secretary has exclusive authority to award grants to public or
private entities under the program to be used for construction, installation,
and associated costs connected with the deployment of Level 2 and Level 3
charging facilities.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1273 is repealed.
19-5-1273. Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Fund”.
*CRH225*
03/07/2025 9:16:36 AM CRH225

SB416
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues authorized by law;
(2) Moneys obtained from private grants or other sources that
are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(3) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Secretary of the Department of
Energy and Environment as provided in § 15-10-101.





























03/07/2025 9:16:36 AM CRH225